District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

47-1814.01

Requirement for a professional license.

Repealed.

History

July 16, 1947, 61 Stat. 357, ch. 258, art. I, title XIV, § 1
May 27, 1949, 63 Stat. 133, ch. 146, title IV, § 419
Mar. 31, 1956, 70 Stat. 79, ch. 154, § 15
Sept. 4, 1957, 71 Stat. 606, Pub. L. 85-281, § 7
Oct. 31, 1969, 83 Stat. 179, Pub. L. 91-106, title VI, § 604(b)(1)
Apr. 19, 1977, D.C. Law 1-124, title IV, § 401(f), 23 DCR 8749
Mar. 6, 1979, D.C. Law 2-158, § 4, 25 DCR 7002
June 22, 1983, D.C. Law 5-14, § 904, 30 DCR 2632
Sept. 10, 1992, D.C. Law 9-145, § 103(a), 39 DCR 4895
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1243(b), 46 DCR 3142

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-1814.1.
1973 Ed., § 47-1591.

Delegation of Authority

Delegation of authority under Law 5-14, see Mayor’s Order 83-190, July 25, 1983.

Editor's Notes

Mayor authorized to issue rules: Section 1102 of D.C. Law 5-14 provided that the Mayor shall issue rules necessary to carry out the provisions of the act.